Idaho, session 2025, H0137.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 37-2711, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
37-2711. SCHEDULE IV. (a) Schedule IV shall consist of the drugs and
other substances, by whatever official name, common or usual name, chemical
name, or brand name designated, listed in this section.
(b) Narcotic drugs. Unless specifically excepted or unless listed in
another schedule, any material, compound, mixture, or preparation contain-
ing any of the following narcotic drugs, or their salts calculated as the
free anhydrous base or alkaloid, in limited quantities as set forth below:
(1) No more than 1 milligram of difenoxin and not less than 25 micro-
grams of atropine sulfate per dosage unit;
(2) Dextropropoxyphene (alpha-(+)-4-dimethylamino-1, 2-diphenyl-
3-methyl-2-propionoxybutane);
(3) 2- [(dimethylamino)methyl]-1-(3-methoxyphenyl)cyclohexanol (in-
cluding tramadol), including its salts, optical and geometric isomers,
and salts of isomers.
(c) Depressants. Unless specifically excepted or unless listed in an-
other schedule, any material, compound, mixture, or preparation which con-
tains any quantity of the following substances, including its salts, iso-
mers, and salts of isomers whenever the existence of such salts, isomers, and
salts of isomers is possible within the specific chemical designation:
(1) Alfaxalone 5[alpha]-pregnan-3[alpha]-ol-11,20-dione;
(2) Alprazolam;
(3) Barbital;
(4) Bromazepam;
(5) Camazepam;
(6) Carisoprodol;
(7) Chloral betaine;
(8) Chloral hydrate;
(9) Chlordiazepoxide;
(10) Clobazam;
(11) Clonazepam;
(12) Clorazepate;
(13) Clotiazepam;
(14) Cloxazolam;
(15) Daridorexant;
(16) Delorazepam;


(17) Diazepam;
(18) Dichloralphenazone;
(19) Estazolam;
(20) Ethchlorvynol;
(21) Ethinamate;
(22) Ethyl loflazepate;
(23) Fludiazepam;
(24) Flurazepam;
(25) Fospropofol;
(26) Halazepam;
(27) Haloxazolam;
(28) Ketazolam;
(29) Lemborexant;
(30) Loprazolam;
(31) Lorazepam;
(32) Lormetazepam;
(33) Mebutamate;
(34) Medazepam;
(35) Meprobamate;
(36) Methohexital;
(37) Methylphenobarbital (mephobarbital);
(38) Midazolam;
(39) Nimetazepam;
(40) Nitrazepam;
(41) Nordiazepam;
(42) Oxazepam;
(43) Oxazolam;
(44) Paraldehyde;
(45) Petrichloral;
(46) Phenobarbital;
(47) Pinazepam;
(48) Prazepam;
(49) Quazepam;
(50) Remimazolam;
(51) Serdexmethylpheniate;
(52) Suvorexant;
(53) Temazepam;
(54) Tetrazepam;
(55) Triazolam;
(56) Zaleplon;
(57) Zolpidem;
(58) Zopiclone.
(d) Fenfluramine -- Any material, compound, mixture, or preparation
which contains any quantity of the following substances, including its
salts, isomers (whether optical, position, or geometric), and salts of such
isomers, whenever the existence of such salts, isomers, and salts of isomers
is possible:
(1) Dexfenfluramine;
(2) Fenfluramine.


(e) Stimulants. Unless specifically excepted or unless listed in an-
other schedule, any material, compound, mixture, or preparation which con-
tains any quantity of the following substances having a stimulant effect on
the central nervous system, including its salts, isomers (whether optical,
position, or geometric), and salts of such isomers whenever the existence
of such salts, isomers, and salts of isomers is possible within the specific
chemical designation:
(1) Cathine ((+)-norpseudoephedrine);
(2) Diethylpropion;
(3) Fencamfamin;
(4) Fenproporex;
(5) Lorcaserin;
(6) Mazindol;
(7) Mefenorex;
(8) Modafinil;
(9) Pemoline (including organometallic complexes and chelates
thereof);
(10) Phentermine;
(11) Pipradrol;
(12) Sibutramine;
(13) SPA ((-)-1-dimethylamino-1,2-diphenylethane);
(14) Solriamfetol(2-amino-3-phenylpropyl carbamata; benzenepropanol,
beta-amino-, carbamate(ester)).
(f) Other substances. Unless specifically excepted, or unless listed
in another schedule, any material, compound, mixture or preparation which
contains any quantity of the following substances, including its salts:
(1) Brexanolone (3A-hydroxy-5A-pregnan-20-one), allopregnanolone;
(2) Butorphanol (including its optical isomers);
(3) Eluxadoline (5-[[[(2S)-2-amino-3-[4-aminocarbonyl)-2,6-
dimethylphenyl]-1-oxopropyl][(1S)-1-(4-phenyl-1H-imidazol-2-
yl)ethyl]amino]methyl]-2-methoxybenzoic acid) (including its optical
isomers) and its salts, isomers, and salts of isomers;
(4) Mifepristone;
(5) Misoprostol;
(4) (6) Pentazocine.
(g) The board may except, by rule, any compound, mixture, or prepara-
tion containing any depressant substance listed in subsection (c) of this
section from the application of all or any part of this act if the compound,
mixture, or preparation contains one (1) or more active medicinal ingredi-
ents not having a depressant effect on the central nervous system, and if the
admixtures are included therein in combinations, quantity, proportion, or
concentration that vitiate the potential for abuse of the substances which
have a depressant effect on the central nervous system.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.